test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv15_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: tonn
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: tonn
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: tonn
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: tannar
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: tenn
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: tonnum
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: tanna
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: tonnin
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: tonnina
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: tonnini
    tonn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: tannarinnar
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: tenninar
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: tonnunum
    tonn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: tannanna
